Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Article 2. Currency Issuance and Circulation.

§ 6.2-202.
Issuance of currency and related prohibited acts.

No individual or entity, unless authorized by law, shall:

Issue any note, bill, scrip, or other paper or thing with intent that the same be circulated as currency; or

Otherwise deal, trade, or carry on business as a bank of circulation.

All contracts made for forming any entity to engage in any activity prohibited by subsection A shall be void.

History.

1987, c. 622, § 6.1-330.52; 2010, c. 794.

Law Review.

For comment, “Obtaining and Enforcing a Security Interest in Local Currency Under Article 9 of the UCC,” see 53 U. Rich. L. Rev. 769 (2019).

§ 6.2-203.
Contracts and securities from illegal currency dealing void; recovery of payments.

All contracts and securities that originate from, or are made or obtained in whole or in part by means of any illegal currency dealing, trade, or business, shall be void.

If any person pays any money or other valuable consideration on account of any contract or security originating from, or made or obtained in whole or in part by means of, any illegal currency dealing, trade, or business, such person or his representative or assignee may recover the amount or value of such payment from the person to whom, or to whose use, the payment was made, by bringing suit within one year after such payment.

History.

1987, c. 622, § 6.1-330.52; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-204.
Capital stock of certain entities vested in Commonwealth; proceedings to recover stock; liability.

The capital stock of every entity formed to engage in any activity prohibited by subsection A of §

6.2-202

, whether paid up or merely subscribed, shall belong to the Commonwealth. The Attorney General, whenever informed of the existence of any such entity, shall institute a suit in the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond, for the purpose of recovering such capital stock. In such suit, all or any of the members of such entity, and any of its officers, agents, or managers, may be made defendants, and compelled to exhibit all their books and papers, and an account of everything necessary to enable the court to enter a proper order.

No disclosure made by a defendant in such suit, and no book or paper exhibited by him in answer to the bill, or under the order of the court, shall be used as evidence against him in any case at law.

Every member of any entity formed to engage in any activity prohibited by subsection A of §

6.2-202

who is made defendant in any such suit, shall be held liable to the Commonwealth for his proportion of the capital stock in such entity held by him, or for his use or benefit, at the institution of such suit, or at the time of the order. Such order against any defendant shall be a bar to a proceeding against him for any act done in violation of subsection A of §

6.2-202

.

History.

1987, c. 622, § 6.1-330.52; 2010, c. 794.